lexica/adverbs_rules.lexc
LEXICON Adverb
LEXICON AdverbInf
+Adverb+General+Positive@D.SUP@:@D.SUP@ #;
+Adverb+General+Comparative@D.SUP@:+Adverb^eje@D.SUP@ #;
+Adverb+General+Comparative@D.SUP@:+Adverb^ejše@D.SUP@ #;
+Adverb+General+Superlative@R.SUP@:+Adverb^eje@R.SUP@ #;
+Adverb+General+Superlative@R.SUP@:+Adverb^ejše@R.SUP@ #;

LEXICON AdverbPart
+Adverb+AdvParticiple@D.SUP@:@D.SUP@ #;
